Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.080

License—Generally.

(1) The department shall license each qualified applicant who satisfactorily completes the required examinations for his or her profession and complies with administrative procedures and administrative requirements established pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2) The board shall waive the requirements of RCW 18.35.040 and 18.35.050 and grant an audiology license to a person who on January 1, 2003, holds a current audiology certificate issued by the department.

(3) The board shall waive the requirements of RCW 18.35.040 and 18.35.050 and grant a speech-language pathology license to a person who on January 1, 2003, holds a current speech-language pathology certificate issued by the department.

[ 2002 c 310 s 7; 1997 c 275 s 4. Prior: 1996 c 200 s 9; 1996 c 191 s 20; 1991 c 3 s 83; 1989 c 198 s 4; 1985 c 7 s 32; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 38; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.